Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 8. Interstate Rendition.

Collateral references. —

Extradition under state statutes providing for reciprocal enforcement of duty to support dependents, 42 ALR2d 768.

Sec. 25.25.801.
Grounds for rendition.

The governor or a designee of the governor may

demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

on the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this chapter applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled from that state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 98 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(2), substituted “on the demand of the governor” for “on the demand by the governor” at the beginning.

Sec. 25.25.802.
Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state or the designee of the governor may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that the obligee had initiated proceedings for support under this chapter at least 60 days previously or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

If, under this chapter or a law substantially similar to this chapter, or the former provisions of this chapter, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor or a designee of the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor or designee may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor or the designee of the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor or designee may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 99, 100 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), deleted “the uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act, or the revised uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act” following “provisions of this chapter,”, and made a stylistic change.